Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-904
Transmission line outside city prohibited.

Nothing contained in sections 17-901 to 17-903 shall be construed as granting power to any city of the second class or village to construct and maintain transmission lines outside of such city or village for the purpose of selling electricity, power, steam or other product of its plant to another municipality or the residents therein.

Laws 1919, c. 49, § 1, p. 144;

C.S.1922, § 4317;

C.S.1929, § 17-508;

R.S.1943, § 17-904.